lexd/ru_lemmas/n.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasN
а-бачен<n>:ребята<n>
а-бачо<n>:ребята<n>
а-чен<n>:ребята<n>
абаш<n>:чернокожий<n>
абδуст<n>:рукавица<n>
абδустеҷ<n>:материал<n>
абед<n>:обед<n>
абӣб<n>:название_дикорастущего_цветка<n>
абӣб<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
абӣн<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
абӣнêрӡ<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
абӣнен<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
абӣнорҷ<n>:жена_многоженца<n>
абӣн<n>:ненавистница<n>
абӣнêрӡ<n>:ненавистница<n>
абӣнен<n>:ненавистница<n>
абӣнорҷ<n>:ненавистница<n>
абку̊м<n>:обком<n>
апку̊м<n>:обком<n>
обку̊м<n>:обком<n>
абку̊м<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
апку̊м<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
обку̊м<n>:секретарь_обкома<n>
абку̊мпāрт<n>:обком_партии<n>
абку̊мпāртийа<n>:обком_партии<n>
обку̊мпāрт<n>:обком_партии<n>
обку̊мпāртийа<n>:обком_партии<n>
аблагари<n>:глупость<n>
аблаги<n>:глупость<n>
аблаку̊в<n>:цеп<n>
аблā<n>:глупец<n>
аблā<n>:простак<n>
аботā<n>:глупец<n>
аботā<n>:глупость<n>
абохи<n>:тупость<n>
абрайеҷ<n>:ткань_для_лицевой_стороны_одежды<n>
абрат<n>:обман<n>
абрат-δāδӣҷ<n>:обманщик<n>
абрā<n>:лицевая_сторона_ткани<n>
абрех̌ум<n>:шелк<n>
вирех̌ум<n>:шелк<n>
абрех̌ум<n>:шелк<n>
вирех̌ум<n>:шелк<n>
абрê<n>:облако<n>
абри<n>:облако<n>
ҳабрê<n>:облако<n>
абридахи<n>:облачность<n>
абтари<n>:лень<n>
абӯбāк<n>:удод<n>
бубӯбāк<n>:удод<n>
абҷад<n>:абджад<n>
авāнц<n>:аванс<n>
авāр<n>:авария<n>
авиāцийа<n>:авиация<n>
авийāцийа<n>:авиация<n>
авих̌ц<n>:пучок<n>
авлӣз<n>:стенки_глиняного_сосуда<n>
аw-аw<n>:тявканье<n>
аw-аw<n>:слух<n>
аwал-вегā<n>:сумерки<n>
аwас<n>:желание<n>
аwwал<n>:начало<n>
аwал<n>:начало<n>
аwели<n>:дом<n>
аwеҷ-хух̌пā<n>:похлебка<n>
аwлāқ<n>:скиталец<n>
аwлāқи<n>:скиталец<n>
аwлāқгари<n>:скитание<n>
аwлāқигари<n>:скитание<n>
аwли<n>:двор<n>
аwлийо<n>:предсказатель<n>
аwлод<n>:потомок<n>
аwлод<n>:близкие<n>
аwлодā<n>:потомство<n>
аwлод-бāх̌<n>:разделение_по_родству<n>
аwо<n>:воздух<n>
аwо<n>:погода<n>
аwо<n>:климат<n>
аwобаланди<n>:высокомерие<n>
аwо-буцак<n>:небольшой_дождь_или_снег_при_солнце<n>
аwоги<n>:погода<n>
аwойи<n>:погода<n>
āwоз<n>:голос<n>
аwоз<n>:голос<n>
оwоз<n>:голос<n>
āwоз<n>:право_голоса<n>
аwоз<n>:право_голоса<n>
оwоз<n>:право_голоса<n>
аwоз-δêд<n>:голосование<n>
оwоз-δêд<n>:голосование<n>
аwолā<n>:кидание<n>
аwопаймо<n>:воздухоплаватель<n>
аwопаймойи<n>:воздухоплавание<n>
аwохо<n>:хвастун<n>
аwохойи<n>:хвастовство<n>
аwрат<n>:женщина<n>
аwрат<n>:жена<n>
аwратӣнā<n>:женский_пол<n>
аwз<n>:бассейн<n>
аwӡ<n>:бассейн<n>
аwӡи<n>:глубина<n>
аwғу̊н<n>:афганец<n>
афғу̊н<n>:афганец<n>
аwқот<n>:пропитание<n>
афқот<n>:пропитание<n>
аwқот-вор<n>:тот<n>
аwқотwори<n>:продукты_питания<n>
аwҷ<n>:энтузиазм<n>
ага-чи<n>:побудка<n>
ага-чӣд<n>:побудка<n>
агент<n>:агент<n>
агетпӯнкт<n>:агитпункт<n>
агитāтор<n>:агитатор<n>
агитāтур<n>:агитатор<n>
агитāтори<n>:агитаторство<n>
агитāтури<n>:агитаторство<n>
агитāцийа<n>:агитация<n>
аграну̊м<n>:агроном<n>
аграну̊ми<n>:обязанности_агронома<n>
адаб<n>:благонравие<n>
адабийот<n>:литература<n>
адад<n>:число<n>
адāх̌ц<n>:железная_накладка_в_верхнем_жернове_водяной_мельницы<n>
адāғ̌ӡ<n>:железная_накладка_в_верхнем_жернове_водяной_мельницы<n>
адwо<n>:средства<n>
идwо<n>:средства<n>
йидwо<n>:средства<n>
адир<n>:луг<n>
адгāл<n>:одеяло<n>
адйāл<n>:одеяло<n>
адли<n>:справедливость<n>
адо<n>:выполнение<n>
адолат<n>:справедливость<n>
адолатхо<n>:поборник_справедливости<n>
а-δа<n>:эй<n>
аθêрӣҷ<n>:податель<n>
аθич<n>:пучок<n>
адич<n>:пучок<n>
аждаор<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждар<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждаҳор<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждуор<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
аждуҳор<n>:сказочное_чудовище<n>
азал<n>:начало<n>
азал<n>:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
азӣз<n>:имя_собств_муж_и_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
азли<n>:шутка<n>
азлигӯй<n>:шутник<n>
азо<n>:траур<n>
азоб<n>:мучение<n>
азойим<n>:заклинания<n>
азорзā<n>:мешанка<n>
азорсалги<n>:тысячелетие<n>
азорсолаги<n>:тысячелетие<n>
азорҷӣд<n>:отдел_желудка<n>
азрат<n>:светлость<n>
азрат<n>:компонент_имени_собств_муж<n>
аз-ро-δāδӣҷ<n>:совратитель<n>
аз-ро-зан<n>:совратитель<n>
айал-даwо<n>:старание<n>
айб<n>:изъян<n>
айб<n>:вина<n>
айбдор<n>:виновник<n>
айбдори<n>:виновность<n>
айбну̊мā<n>:обвинительное_заключение<n>
айбпӯх̌и<n>:сокрытие_недостатков<n>
айбпӯши<n>:сокрытие_недостатков<n>
айwу̊н<n>:животное<n>
еwу̊н<n>:животное<n>
айwу̊нгари<n>:скотство<n>
айwу̊ни<n>:скотство<n>
еwу̊ни<n>:скотство<n>
айwу̊ндор<n>:владеющий_скотом<n>
айwу̊ндори<n>:животноводство<n>
айwу̊нот<n>:животные<n>
āйд<n>:праздник<n>
айд<n>:праздник<n>
йӣд<n>:праздник<n>
ӣд<n>:праздник<n>
айкал<n>:памятник<n>
екал<n>:памятник<n>
йекал<n>:памятник<n>
айкал<n>:амулет<n>
екал<n>:амулет<n>
йекал<n>:амулет<n>
ай-кинӣҷ<n>:погонщик<n>
ай-кунӣҷ<n>:погонщик<n>
айму̊н<n>:вера<n>
аймун<n>:вера<n>
ему̊н<n>:вера<n>
йему̊н<n>:вера<n>
йемун<n>:вера<n>
айни<n>:самое_время<n>
айо<n>:стыд<n>
аййор<n>:имя_собств_или_его_компонент<n>
айор<n>:имя_собств_или_его_компонент<n>
айори<n>:хитрость<n>
айос<n>:мороз<n>
айот<n>:жизнь<n>
айот<n>:память<n>
айоти<n>:память<n>
айрапилāн<n>:аэроплан<n>
алапилāн<n>:аэроплан<n>
айрапорт<n>:аэропорт<n>
айрат<n>:удивление<n>
айру̊нги<n>:удивление<n>
айру̊ни<n>:удивление<n>
еру̊нги<n>:удивление<n>
йеру̊нги<n>:удивление<n>
айу̊м<n>:праздник<n>
айу̊м<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
айу̊меҷ<n>:продукты<n>
айу̊ғи<n>:верхняя_часть_позвоночника<n>
айш<n>:наслаждение<n>
академ<n>:академия<n>
академи<n>:академия<n>
академ<n>:академик<n>
академи<n>:академик<n>
академийā<n>:академия<n>
академик<n>:академик<n>
акак<n>:дрожь<n>
акā<n>:брат<n>
акā<n>:эй<n>
акбар<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
акӣм<n>:врач<n>
акӣм<n>:имя_собств_муж_или_его_компонент<n>
āкс<n>:отражение<n>
āкц<n>:отражение<n>
акс<n>:отражение<n>
акц<n>:отражение<n>
āкс<n>:испуг<n>
āкц<n>:испуг<n>
акс<n>:испуг<n>
акц<n>:испуг<n>
аксарийат<n>:большинство<n>
актӣв<n>:актив<n>
актӣв<n>:активист<n>
акӯмат<n>:правительство<n>
укӯмат<n>:правительство<n>
алаби<n>:чашка<n>
алалаш<n>:смесь<n>
алараш<n>:смесь<n>
аралаш<n>:смесь<n>
арараш<n>:смесь<n>
алалот<n>:громкий_шум<n>
алалот<n>:плач<n>
алам<n>:обида<n>
алам<n>:огорчение<n>
аламу̊н<n>:вор<n>
аламӯн<n>:вор<n>
алаф<n>:трава<n>
алафзор<n>:луг<n>
албу̊м<n>:альбом<n>
албу̊н<n>:альбом<n>
алwанд<n>:подготовка_тока_для_молотьбы<n>
алwо<n>:халва<n>
алwо<n>:имя_собств_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
алwобаӡ<n>:мастерица_готовить_халву<n>
алwопаӡ<n>:мастерица_готовить_халву<n>
алwу̊н<n>:кумач<n>
алиле<n>:плач<n>
алиф<n>:алиф<n>
алиф<n>:черта<n>
алиф<n>:имя_собственное_или_его_компонент<n>
алиф<n>:олифа<n>
алифбê<n>:азбука<n>
алифбо<n>:азбука<n>
айлок<n>:пресный_сыр<n>
алйок<n>:пресный_сыр<n>
алйумӣн<n>:алюминий<n>
алумӣн<n>:алюминий<n>
алло<n>:безудержный_плач<n>
ало<n>:безудержный_плач<n>
аллоз<n>:прыжок<n>
алоз<n>:прыжок<n>
алмасти<n>:ведьма<n>
алмасти<n>:обжора<n>
алмос<n>:алмаз<n>
алмос<n>:кварц<n>
алмос-жӣр<n>:кварц<n>
а-ло<n>:сестра<n>
а-ло<n>:обращение_родственников_друг_к_другу<n>
алоw<n>:огонь<n>
алоwā<n>:пламя<n>
алоwгāр<n>:кочегар<n>
алоw-зибидак<n>:прыганье_через_огонь<n>
алоw-парак<n>:прыганье_через_огонь<n>
алок<n>:гибель<n>
алокат<n>:гибель<n>
алоки<n>:туша_архара<n>
алоли<n>:годный_для_убоя<n>
алочā<n>:алча<n>
алоқадор<n>:имеющий_отношение<n>
алоқадори<n>:наличие_связей<n>
алоқаманд<n>:имеющий_отношение<n>
алоқā<n>:связь<n>
алоқā<n>:пара_подков<n>
алпинӣст<n>:альпинист<n>
алтой<n>:помесь_волка_с_собакой<n>
алтой<n>:собака<n>
алу̊мат<n>:знак<n>
алғаw-бозор<n>:гвалт<n>
алғоw<n>:супряга<n>
алғоwдак<n>:род_коршуна<n>
алғоғ̌дак<n>:род_коршуна<n>
ғилwоғ̌дак<n>:род_коршуна<n>
алғ̌анҷол<n>:слива<n>
алқ<n>:горло<n>
алқанҷак<n>:вид_узла<n>
алқā<n>:петля<n>
амак<n>:дядя<n>
амакйу̊н<n>:дядя<n>
мак<n>:дядя<n>
макйу̊н<n>:дядя<n>
амак<n>:дядюшка<n>
амакйу̊н<n>:дядюшка<n>
мак<n>:дядюшка<n>
макйу̊н<n>:дядюшка<n>
амак-бачā<n>:двоюродный_брат<n>
амакӣ<n>:дядя<n>
макӣ<n>:дядя<n>
амал<n>:название_месяца_солнечного_календаря<n>
амал<n>:выкуп_за_невесту<n>
амал<n>:занятие<n>
амалдор<n>:должностное_лицо<n>
амалдори<n>:руководство<n>
амалийот<n>:деятельность<n>
амалпараст<n>:карьерист<n>
амаро<n>:товарищ<n>
ама-ху̊мбаӡ<n>:месяц_созревания_всех_плодов<n>
амаҷӣ<n>:название_птицы<n>
амаҷӣд<n>:название_птицы<n>
амā<n>:тетка<n>
амагу̊н<n>:тетка<n>
амайен<n>:тетка<n>
аммā<n>:тетка<n>
аммагу̊н<n>:тетка<n>
аммайен<n>:тетка<n>
амā<n>:тетушка<n>
амагу̊н<n>:тетушка<n>
амайен<n>:тетушка<n>
аммā<n>:тетушка<n>
аммагу̊н<n>:тетушка<n>
аммайен<n>:тетушка<n>
амбар<n>:название_душистой_травы<n>
амбêх̌ц<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
амбах̌ц<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
амбех̌ц<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
анбах̌ц<n>:древовидный_можжевельник<n>
амбор<n>:зерно_или_мука<n>
амбордор<n>:владелец_запасов_зерна<n>
амбори<n>:запасы_муки_или_зерна<n>
амбур<n>:щипцы<n>
анбур<n>:щипцы<n>
амбу̊н<n>:амбон<n>
анбу̊н<n>:амбон<n>
амбу̊н<n>:амбон<n>
анбу̊н<n>:амбон<n>
амwатан<n>:соотечественник<n>
амгап<n>:собеседник<n>
амдард<n>:тот<n>
амдард<n>:товарищ_по_несчастью<n>
амдарди<n>:соболезнование<n>
амдарс<n>:соученик<n>
амдил<n>:одного_мнения<n>
амдӣн<n>:единоверец<n>
амдӣн<n>:и_с_м_амдн<n>
амдод<n>:помощь<n>
амдодгāр<n>:помощник<n>
амеδ<n>:надежда<n>
умеδ<n>:надежда<n>
амех̌а-пати<n>:игрок_в_поло<n>
амех̌а-патти<n>:игрок_в_поло<n>
āмийат<n>:значение<n>
амийат<n>:значение<n>
амӣр<n>:эмир<n>
амӣр<n>:компонент_имени_собств_муж<n>
амкасп<n>:коллега<n>
амкор<n>:коллега<n>
амкори<n>:сотрудничество<n>
амлā-δāδӣҷ<n>:пловец<n>
амла-δāδӣҷ<n>:пловец<n>
амлазан<n>:пловец<n>
амлā<n>:нападение<n>
амлā<n>:взмах<n>
амлā<n>:темп<n>
амнах̌ӣн<n>:соратник<n>
амних̌ӣн<n>:соратник<n>
амнум<n>:тезка<n>
амо<n>:орелбородач<n>
амоwози<n>:согласие<n>
амойӣл<n>:перевязь<n>
амол<n>:сверстник<n>
аморат<n>:здание<n>
иморат<n>:здание<n>
аморат<n>:наряд<n>
иморат<n>:наряд<n>
аморат-ху̊нā<n>:дворец<n>
иморат-ху̊нā<n>:дворец<n>
амоч<n>:клецки<n>
амочеҷ<n>:мука_для_приготовления_мелких_клецок<n>
амоҷак<n>:эфедра<n>
ампӣрā<n>:люди<n>
амрадӣф<n>:сверстник<n>
амри<n>:приказ<n>
амро<n>:попутчик<n>
амрогу̊н<n>:попутчик<n>
амройен<n>:попутчик<n>
амро<n>:друг<n>
амрогу̊н<n>:друг<n>
амройен<n>:друг<n>
амроз<n>:наперсник<n>
амсабақ<n>:соученик<n>
амсаф<n>:соратник<n>
амсин<n>:сверстник<n>
амсинд<n>:сверстник<n>
амсинф<n>:одноклассник<n>
амсойаги<n>:соседство<n>
амсойадор<n>:тот<n>
амсойā<n>:сосед<n>
амсойагу̊н<n>:сосед<n>
амсойайен<n>:сосед<n>
ҳамсойā<n>:сосед<n>
амсол<n>:сверстник<n>
амсу̊бат<n>:собеседник<n>
амсӯбат<n>:собеседник<n>
амтабāқ<n>:сотрапезник<n>
амтабақ<n>:сотрапезник<n>
амӯδ<n>:плодородная_почва<n>
амму̊м<n>:баня<n>
аму̊м<n>:баня<n>
амму̊мчи<n>:банщик<n>
аму̊мчи<n>:банщик<n>
аму̊н<n>:мир<n>
аму̊нат<n>:заем<n>
аму̊нати<n>:заем<n>
аму̊ни<n>:спокойствие<n>
амшӣрā<n>:сестра<n>
ангахцӣҷ<n>:заика<n>
ингахцӣҷ<n>:заика<n>
йингахцӣҷ<n>:заика<n>
ангилӣс<n>:англичанин<n>
ангирез<n>:англия<n>
ангирез<n>:англичанин<n>
ангирези<n>:английский<n>
ангих̌т<n>:палец<n>
ингах̌т<n>:палец<n>
йингах̌т<n>:палец<n>
ангих̌так<n>:пальчик<n>
ингах̌так<n>:пальчик<n>
ангих̌т-му̊к<n>:наперсток<n>
ингах̌т-му̊г<n>:наперсток<n>
ингах̌т-мӯг<n>:наперсток<n>
ангих̌т-ру̊н<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ангих̌т-ру̊ни<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ангих̌т-рӯн<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ангих̌т-рӯни<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ингах̌т-ру̊н<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ингах̌т-ру̊ни<n>:вторая_обмазка_стен<n>
ангишт<n>:каменный_уголь<n>
ангӯрδ<n>:виноградная_лоза<n>
ангӯрδ<n>:виноград<n>
ангӯрδдор<n>:владелец_винограда<n>
ангӯрδзор<n>:виноградник<n>
ангу̊хӣҷ<n>:тот<n>
ингу̊хӣҷ<n>:тот<n>
андалеб<n>:соловей<n>
андалӣб<n>:соловей<n>
андалеб<n>:имя_собств_муж_андалб<n>
андалӣб<n>:имя_собств_муж_андалб<n>
андех̌ā<n>:мысль<n>
андех̌ā<n>:опасение<n>
андиwол<n>:приятель<n>
андиwолгу̊н<n>:приятель<n>
андиwолен<n>:приятель<n>
андӣдак<n>:вставание<n>
индӣдак<n>:вставание<n>
андовā<n>:штукатурка<n>
андоз<n>:налог<n>
андозайеҷ<n>:материал<n>
андоз<n>:мера<n>
андозā<n>:мера<n>
андоз<n>:мерка<n>
андозā<n>:мерка<n>
анду̊м<n>:тело<n>
инду̊м<n>:тело<n>
анор<n>:гранат<n>
анор<n>:имя_собств_жен_или_его_компонент<n>
анорзор<n>:гранатовая_роща<n>
ансāмбул<n>:ансамбль<n>
асāмбул<n>:ансамбль<n>
асāнбул<n>:ансамбль<n>
анцāвиӡ<n>:шитье<n>
инцāвиӡ<n>:шитье<n>
анцāвӣҷ<n>:швец<n>
инцāвӣҷ<n>:швец<n>
йинцāвӣҷ<n>:швец<n>
анӡем<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
